Utah statutes.
62A-15-631.   Involuntary commitment under court order -- Examination --
Hearing -- Power of court -- Findings required -- Costs.
(1)  Proceedings for involuntary commitment of an individual who is 18 years
of age or older may be commenced by filing a written application with the
district court of the county in which the proposed patient resides or is
found, by a responsible person who has reason to know of the condition or
circumstances of the proposed patient which lead to the belief that the
individual is mentally ill and should be involuntarily committed.  That
application shall be accompanied by:
(a)  a certificate of a licensed physician or a designated examiner stating
that within a seven-day period immediately preceding the certification the
physician or designated examiner has examined the individual, and that he is
of the opinion that the individual is mentally ill and should be involuntarily
committed; or
(b)  a written statement by the applicant that the individual has been
requested to but has refused to submit to an examination of mental condition
by a licensed physician or designated examiner.  That application shall be
sworn to under oath and shall state the facts upon which the application is
based.
(2)  Prior to issuing a judicial order, the court may require the applicant to
consult with the appropriate local mental health authority, or may direct a
mental health professional from that local mental health authority to
interview the applicant and the proposed patient to determine the existing
facts and report them to the court.
(3)  If the court finds from the application, from any other statements under
oath, or from any reports from a mental health professional that there is a
reasonable basis to believe that the proposed patient has a mental illness
which poses a substantial danger, as defined in Section 62A-15-602, to
himself, others, or property requiring involuntary commitment pending
examination and hearing; or, if the proposed patient has refused to submit to
an interview with a mental health professional as directed by the court or to
go to a treatment facility voluntarily, the court may issue an order, directed
to a mental health officer or peace officer, to immediately place the proposed
patient in the custody of a local mental health authority or in a temporary
emergency facility as provided in Section  62A-15-634 to be detained for the
purpose of examination. Within 24 hours of the issuance of the order for
examination, a local mental health authority or its designee shall report to
the court, orally or in writing, whether the patient is, in the opinion of the
examiners, mentally ill, whether the patient has agreed to become a voluntary
patient under Section 62A-15-625, and whether treatment programs are available
and acceptable without court proceedings. Based on that information, the court
may, without taking any further action, terminate the proceedings and dismiss
the application.  In any event, if the examiner reports orally, he shall
immediately send the report in writing to the clerk of the court.
(4)  Notice of commencement of proceedings for involuntary commitment, setting
forth the allegations of the application and any reported facts, together with
a copy of any official order of detention, shall be provided by the court to a
proposed patient prior to, or upon, placement in the custody of a local mental
health authority or, with respect to any individual presently in the custody
of a local mental health authority whose status is being changed from
voluntary to involuntary, upon the filing of an application for that purpose
with the court.  A copy of that order of detention shall be maintained at the
place of detention.
(5)  Notice of commencement of those proceedings shall be provided by the
court as soon as practicable to the applicant, any legal guardian, any
immediate adult family members, legal counsel for the parties involved, and
any other persons whom the proposed patient or the court shall designate. That
notice shall advise those persons that a hearing may be held within the time
provided by law.  If the patient has refused to permit release of information
necessary for provisions of notice under this subsection, the extent of notice
shall be determined by the court.
(6)  Proceedings for commitment of an individual under the age of 18 years to
the division may be commenced by filing a written application with the
juvenile court in accordance with the provisions of Part 7.
(7)  The district court may, in its discretion, transfer the case to any other
district court within this state, provided that the transfer will not be
adverse to the interest of the proposed patient.
(8) (a)  Within 24 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of
the issuance of a judicial order, or after commitment  of a proposed patient
to a local mental health authority under court order for detention or
examination, the court shall appoint two designated examiners to examine the
proposed patient.  If requested by the proposed patient's counsel, the court
shall appoint, as one of the examiners, a reasonably available qualified
person designated by counsel.  The examinations, to be conducted separately,
shall be held at the home of the proposed patient, a hospital or other medical
facility, or at any other suitable place that is not likely to have a harmful
effect on the patient's health.
(b)  The examiner shall inform the patient if not represented by an attorney
that, if desired, the patient does not have to say anything, the nature and
reasons for the examination, that it was ordered by the court, that any
information volunteered could form part of the basis for his or her
involuntary commitment, and that findings resulting from the examination will
be made available to the court.
(c)  A time shall be set for a hearing to be held within ten calendar days of
the appointment of the designated examiners, unless those examiners or a local
mental health authority or its designee informs the court prior to that
hearing date that the patient is not mentally ill, that he has agreed to
become a voluntary patient under Section 62A-15-625, or that treatment
programs are available and acceptable without court proceedings, in which
event the court may, without taking any further action, terminate the
proceedings and dismiss the application.
(9) (a)  Prior to the hearing, an opportunity to be represented by counsel
shall be afforded to every proposed patient, and if neither the patient nor
others provide counsel, the court shall appoint counsel and allow him
sufficient time to consult with the patient prior to the hearing. In the case
of an indigent patient, the payment of reasonable attorneys' fees for counsel,
as determined by the court, shall be made by the county in which the patient
resides or was found.
(b)  The proposed patient, the applicant, and all other persons to whom notice
is required to be given shall be afforded an opportunity to appear at the
hearing, to testify, and to present and cross-examine witnesses. The court
may, in its discretion, receive the testimony of any other person.  The court
may allow a waiver of the patient's right to appear only for good cause shown,
and that cause shall be made a matter of court record.
(c)  The court is authorized to exclude all persons not necessary for the
conduct of the proceedings and may, upon motion of counsel, require the
testimony of each examiner to be given out of the presence of any other
examiners.
(d)  The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a manner as may be
consistent with orderly procedure, and in a physical setting that is not
likely to have a harmful effect on the mental health of the proposed patient.
(e)  The court shall consider all relevant historical and material information
which is offered, subject to the rules of evidence, including reliable hearsay
under Rule 1102, Utah Rules of Evidence.
(f) (i)  A local mental health authority or its designee, or the physician in
charge of the patient's care shall, at the time of the hearing, provide the
court with the following information:
(A)  the detention order;
(B)  admission notes;
(C)  the diagnosis;
(D)  any doctors' orders;
(E)  progress notes;
(F)  nursing notes; and
(G)  medication records pertaining to the current commitment.
(ii)  That information shall also be supplied to the patient's counsel at the
time of the hearing, and at any time prior to the hearing upon request.
(10)  The court shall order commitment of an individual who is 18 years of age
or older to a local mental health authority if, upon completion of the hearing
and consideration of the information presented in accordance with Subsection
(9)(e), the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
(a)  the proposed patient has a mental illness;
(b)  because of the proposed patient's mental illness he poses a substantial
danger, as defined in Section 62A-15-602, of physical injury to others or
himself, which may include the inability to provide the basic necessities of
life such as food, clothing, and shelter, if allowed to remain at liberty;
(c)  the patient lacks the ability to engage in a rational decision-making
process regarding the acceptance of mental treatment as demonstrated by
evidence of inability to weigh the possible risks of accepting or rejecting
treatment;
(d)  there is no appropriate less-restrictive alternative to a court order of
commitment; and
(e)  the local mental health authority can provide the individual with
treatment that is adequate and appropriate to his conditions and needs. In the
absence of the required findings of the court after the hearing, the court
shall forthwith dismiss the proceedings.
(11) (a)  The order of commitment shall designate the period for which the
individual shall be treated.  When the individual is not under an order of
commitment at the time of the hearing, that period may not exceed six months
without benefit of a review hearing.  Upon such a review hearing, to be
commenced prior to the expiration of the previous order, an order for
commitment may be for an indeterminate period, if the court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the required conditions in Subsection (10) will last
for an indeterminate period.
(b)  The court shall maintain a current list of all patients under its order
of commitment.  That list shall be reviewed to determine those patients who
have been under an order of commitment for the designated period.  At least
two weeks prior to the expiration of the designated period of any order of
commitment still in effect, the court that entered the original order shall
inform the appropriate local mental health authority or its designee.  The
local mental health authority or its designee shall immediately reexamine the
reasons upon which the order of commitment was based.  If the local mental
health authority or its designee determines that the conditions justifying
that commitment no longer exist, it shall discharge the patient from
involuntary commitment and immediately report that to the court.  Otherwise,
the court shall immediately appoint two designated examiners and proceed under
Subsections (8) through (10).
(c)  The local mental health authority or its designee responsible for the
care of a patient under an order of commitment for an indeterminate period,
shall at six-month intervals reexamine the reasons upon which the order of
indeterminate commitment was based.  If the local mental health authority or
its designee determines that the conditions justifying that commitment no
longer exist, that local mental health authority or its designee shall
discharge the patient from its custody and immediately report the discharge to
the court.  If the local mental health authority or its designee determines
that the conditions justifying that commitment continue to exist, the local
mental health authority or its designee shall send a written report of those
findings to the court.  The patient and his counsel of record shall be
notified in writing that the involuntary commitment will be continued, the
reasons for that decision, and that the patient has the right to a review
hearing by making a request to the court.  Upon receiving the request, the
court shall immediately appoint two designated examiners and proceed under
Subsections (8) through (10).
(12)  In the event that the designated examiners are unable, because a
proposed patient refuses to submit to an examination, to complete that
examination on the first attempt, the court shall fix a reasonable
compensation to be paid to those designated examiners for their services.
(13)  Any person committed as a result of an original hearing or a person's
legally designated representative who is aggrieved by the findings,
conclusions, and order of the court entered in the original hearing has the
right to a new hearing upon a petition filed with the court within 30 days of
the entry of the court order.  The petition must allege error or mistake in
the findings, in which case the court shall appoint three impartial designated
examiners previously unrelated to the case to conduct an additional
examination of the patient.  The new hearing shall, in all other respects, be
conducted in the manner otherwise permitted.
(14)  Costs of all proceedings under this section shall be paid by the county
in which the proposed patient resides or is found.
